Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-405 Employer responsibility for
fraudulent indorsement by employee. (a) In this section:

(1) "Employee" includes an independent
contractor and employee of an independent contractor retained by the employer.

(2) "Fraudulent indorsement" means (i) in
the case of an instrument payable to the employer, a forged indorsement
purporting to be that of the employer, or (ii) in the case of an instrument
with respect to which the employer is the issuer, a forged indorsement
purporting to be that of the person identified as payee.

(3) "Responsibility" with respect to
instruments means authority (i) to sign or indorse instruments on behalf of the
employer, (ii) to process instruments received by the employer for bookkeeping
purposes, for deposit to an account, or for other disposition, (iii) to prepare
or process instruments for issue in the name of the employer, (iv) to supply
information determining the names or addresses of payees of instruments to be
issued in the name of the employer, (v) to control the disposition of
instruments to be issued in the name of the employer, or (vi) to act otherwise
with respect to instruments in a responsible capacity.

"Responsibility" does not
include authority that merely allows an employee to have access to instruments
or blank or incomplete instrument forms that are being stored or transported or
are part of incoming or outgoing mail, or similar access.

(b) For the purpose of determining the rights
and liabilities of a person who, in good faith, pays an instrument or takes it
for value or for collection, if an employer entrusted an employee with
responsibility with respect to the instrument and the employee or a person
acting in concert with the employee makes a fraudulent indorsement to the
instrument, the indorsement is effective as the indorsement of the person to
whom the instrument is payable if it is made in the name of that person. If
the person paying the instrument or taking it for value or for collection fails
to exercise ordinary care in paying or taking the instrument and that failure
substantially contributes to loss resulting from the fraud, the person bearing
the loss may recover from the person failing to exercise ordinary care to the
extent the failure to exercise ordinary care contributed to the loss.

(c) Under subsection (b), an indorsement is
made in the name of the person to whom an instrument is payable if (i) it is
made in a name substantially similar to the name of that person, or (ii) the
instrument, whether or not indorsed, is deposited in a depositary bank to an
account in a name substantially similar to the name of that person. [L 1991, c
118, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next